Oklahoma, session 2026, SB922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Commercial Game


Fowl Breeders Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.1 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;


2. “Cockfight” or “cockfighting” means the same as defined in


Section 1692.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. “Commercial game fowl breeder” means any individual, entity,


association, trust, or corporation who possesses game fowl for the

Req. No. 1139 Page 2


use of breeding or dealing in game fowls for direct or indirect sale


or for exchange in return for consideration;


4. “Commercial game fowl breeder license” means a license


issued to any person who qualifies and is licensed as a commercial


game fowl breeder;


5. “Department” means the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,


Food, and Forestry;


6. “Facility” means the premises used by one or more commercial


game fowl breeders. The term includes, but is not limited to, all


buildings, properties, and confinement areas in a single location


used to conduct commercial game fowl breeding business;


7. “Game fowl” means a rooster historically bred and trained


for cockfighting; and


8. “Humane society” means a nonprofit organization exempt from


federal income taxation as an organization described in Section


501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that has


as a principal purpose the prevention of animal cruelty or the


sheltering of, caring for, and providing of homes for lost, stray,


and abandoned animals.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.2 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Board of Agriculture shall enforce and administer


the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 1139 Page 3


B. The Board shall adopt the rules necessary to enforce and


administer this act including, but not limited to, rules that:


1. Establish standards for care;


2. Establish reasonable and necessary fees;


3. Establish provisions related to initial and renewal


applications, revocation or nonrenewal of licenses, procedures for


sale of game fowl, and procedures for making complaints; and


4. Establish any other rules deemed necessary by the Board.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.3 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person shall not act, offer to act, or hold himself or


herself out as a commercial game fowl breeder unless the person


holds a license obtained pursuant to this act for each facility that


the person owns or operates in this state.


B. It shall be unlawful for any person to act as a commercial


game fowl breeder licensee, or to hold himself or herself out as


such, unless the person shall have been licensed to do so under this


act.


C. An applicant for a commercial game fowl breeder license


shall meet the criteria established by the State Board of


Agriculture through rules promulgated pursuant to this act.





Req. No. 1139 Page 4


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.4 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


may contract with a local veterinarian licensed by the state, a


state agency, or any other qualified person to conduct or assist in


an initial licensing inspection and annual inspections.


B. The Department shall arrange for an inspection at a facility


prior to the issuance of an initial commercial game fowl breeder


license for that facility.


1. The Department shall not issue a commercial game fowl


breeder license to any person until the Department receives an


initial inspection report from the inspector in a format approved by


the Department certifying that the facility meets the requirements


of this act.


2. Prior to the initial inspection, each applicant shall pay to


the Department a nonrefundable inspection fee.


C. The Department, at least annually, shall arrange for the


inspection of each facility of a licensed commercial game fowl


breeder. The inspection shall ensure the health and safety of the


game fowl including, but not limited to, assessing the health of and


signs of disease in the game fowl and whether the facility provides


a standard of care, checking for injuries or mutilations associated


with cockfighting, and checking the records kept pursuant to Section

Req. No. 1139 Page 5


of this act. The inspection shall be conducted during normal


business hours and the commercial game fowl breeder shall be present


during the inspection. The Department shall not be required to


provide notice prior to an inspection.


D. The inspector shall submit an inspection report to the


Department not later than ten (10) days after the date of the


inspection on a form prescribed by the Department and provide a copy


of the report to the commercial game fowl breeder.


E. On receipt of a valid written complaint alleging a violation


of this act, an authorized agent of the State Board of Agriculture


or an inspector designated by the Department may investigate the


alleged violation.


F. The Department shall not hire any humane society group or


member of any humane society group to perform any inspection


required by this act.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.5 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall issue a commercial game fowl breeder license to each applicant


who:


1. Meets the requirements of this act;


2. Applies to the Department on the form prescribed by the


Department; and

Req. No. 1139 Page 6


3. Pays the required fee.


B. A commercial game fowl breeder shall obtain a separate


license for each facility where a game fowl is kept. A separate


license shall be issued for each facility, regardless of the number


of game fowls at each facility.


C. If a single facility is shared by more than one person, each


person shall be required to become individually licensed.


D. A license issued under this act is valid until January 1 for


a commercial game fowl breeder license in each calendar year and is


nontransferable.


E. A commercial game fowl breeder shall prominently display a


copy of the commercial game fowl breeder license at the facility of


the commercial game fowl breeder. A commercial game fowl breeder


shall include the commercial game fowl breeder license number in


each advertisement for the sale or transfer of a game fowl by the


commercial game fowl breeder. A commercial game fowl breeder shall


include in each contract for the sale or transfer of an animal by


the commercial game fowl breeder the commercial game fowl breeder


license number.


F. A commercial game fowl breeder licensed pursuant to this


section shall notify the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry in writing not later than ten (10) days after the date


any change occurs in the address, name, management, substantial


control, or ownership of the business or operation.

Req. No. 1139 Page 7


G. The State Board of Agriculture shall maintain and post on


its website the directory of commercial game fowl breeders licensed


pursuant to this act.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.6 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


may deny a license, or renewal thereof, or revoke a license of any


applicant or commercial game fowl breeder who fails to meet the


standards of care or fails to follow the application process adopted


by the Department, or if the person:


1. Is convicted of a crime involving animal cruelty;


2. Is convicted of violating the provisions of this act more


than three times;


3. Is convicted of a felony specified in Section 1692.8 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Is convicted of a felony punishable under the Oklahoma


Racketeer-Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act; or


5. Has held or applied for a United States Department of


Agriculture license pursuant to the Animal Welfare Act and whose


license was suspended or revoked, or whose application was refused


due to the improper care of animals.





Req. No. 1139 Page 8


B. The State Board of Agriculture shall post on its website the


directory of commercial game fowl breeders who have been denied


licensing, or whose licenses have been revoked.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.7 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A commercial game fowl breeder who is not in violation of


this act or any rule adopted under this act may renew the license of


the person by:


1. Submitting a renewal application to the Oklahoma Department


of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry on the form prescribed by the


Department;


2. Complying with any other renewal requirements adopted by the


Department; and


3. Paying the required fee.


B. Any person who fails to apply for a renewal in a manner


prescribed by the Department, and whose license has expired, may not


engage in activities that require a license until the license has


been renewed.


C. Not later than sixty (60) days before the expiration of the


license, the Department shall send written notice of the impending


license expiration to the commercial game fowl breeder at the last-


known address according to the records of the Department.



Req. No. 1139 Page 9


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.8 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A commercial game fowl breeder shall maintain a separate


health record for each game fowl in the facility of the commercial


game fowl breeder documenting the health care of the game fowl.


B. The health record shall include, but not be limited to:


1. The breed, color, and identifying marks of the game fowl;


and


2. A record of all inoculations, medications, and other


veterinary medical treatment received by the game fowl while in the


possession of the commercial game fowl breeder.


C. A commercial game fowl breeder shall maintain a separate


breeding record for each game fowl in the facility of the game fowl


breeder documenting the transaction and breeding of each game fowl.


D. This breeding record shall include, but not be limited to:


1. A record of fees associated with the breeding of the game


fowl;


2. Registration documentation of bloodline and ancestry; and


3. The name and contact information of the owner of a breeding


hen or recipient of game fowls bred as allowed in this act.


E. The commercial game fowl breeder shall make the health and


breeding records available on request to the Oklahoma Department of


Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, an authorized agent of the State

Req. No. 1139 Page 10


Board of Agriculture, or any other inspector designated by the


Department.


F. The Department may require additional information to be kept


by a licensed commercial game fowl breeder pursuant to this section.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.9 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. After notice and opportunity for a hearing in accordance


with the Administrative Procedures Act, if the State Board of


Agriculture finds any person in violation of this act or any rule


promulgated or order issued pursuant thereto, the Board shall have


the authority to assess an administrative penalty of not less than


One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) for each violation. Each game fowl, each action, or


each day a violation continues may constitute a separate and


distinct violation. During each license year of the facility, a


facility shall not be subject to more than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) in administrative penalties assessed pursuant to this


subsection.


B. A person commits an offense if the person violates this act


or any rule adopted under this act. Each animal to which a


violation applies and each day that violation continues constitutes


a separate offense. An offense under this subsection is a



Req. No. 1139 Page 11


misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph 1 of subsection G of


this section.


C. A person commits an offense if the person knowingly


falsifies information in a license application, annual report, or


record required under this act. An offense under this subsection is


a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph 1 of subsection G


of this section.


D. An unlicensed commercial game fowl breeder commits an


offense if the person sells, gives, or furnishes in any manner a


game fowl to another person without obtaining proper licensure


pursuant to this act. An offense under this subsection is a


misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph 2 of subsection G of


this section.


E. An unlicensed commercial game fowl breeder commits an


offense if the person advertises game fowl for sale. As used in


this subsection, “advertise” means the act of providing


consideration for the publication, dissemination, solicitation, or


circulation of visual, oral, or written communication to induce


directly or indirectly any person to purchase a game fowl. An


offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable as


provided in subsection G of this section.


F. A commercial game fowl breeder commits an offense if the


commercial game fowl breeder interferes with, hinders, or thwarts


any inspection or investigation under this act or refuses to allow

Req. No. 1139 Page 12


an inspector full access to all areas of the facility where animals


are kept or cared for and all records required to be kept under this


act or under any rule adopted under this act. An offense under this


subsection is a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph 2 of


subsection G of this section.


G. 1. Any violation of subsection B, C, or D of this section


shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00).


2. Any violation of subsection E or F of this section shall be


punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).


H. In addition to penalties and fines, the Board shall have


authority to obtain injunctions against anyone who violates this


act, and shall have authority to obtain or impose civil monetary


penalties on anyone who violates this act, and upon obtaining a


court order, shall have authority to seize and impound game fowls in


the possession, custody, or care of that person if there is reason


to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the game fowl is


endangered, or the game fowl are in imminent danger. The reasonable


costs of transportation, care, and feeding of seized and impounded


game fowls shall be paid by the person from whom the game fowls were


seized and impounded.


I. Nothing in this act shall preclude the Board from seeking


penalties in district court in the maximum amount allowed by law.


The assessment of penalties in an administrative enforcement

Req. No. 1139 Page 13


proceeding shall not prevent the subsequent assessment by a court of


the maximum civil or criminal penalties for violations of this act


and rules promulgated pursuant thereto.


J. Any person assessed an administrative or civil penalty may


be required to pay, in addition to the penalty amount and interest


thereon, attorney fees and costs associated with the collection of


the penalties.


K. If any person refuses, denies, or interferes with any right


of access, the Board shall have the right to apply to and obtain


from a district court an administrative or other warrant as


necessary to enforce the right of access and inspection.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 33.10 of Title 4, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


to be designated the “Commercial Game Fowl Breeders Assistance


Revolving Fund”. All monies accruing to the credit of the


Commercial Game Fowl Breeders Revolving Fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purposes


set forth in subsection C of this section. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of:



Req. No. 1139 Page 14


1. All monies received by the Department for sheltering of


seized game fowls pursuant this act; and


2. Monies received by the Department in the form of gifts,


grants, reimbursements, or from any other source intended to be used


for the purposes specified by or collected pursuant to the


provisions of this act.


B. The monies deposited in the Commercial Game Fowl Breeders


Assistance Revolving Fund shall be excluded from budget and


expenditure limitations and shall at no time become part of the


general budget of the Department or any other state agency. Except


as provided for in this section, no monies from the Commercial Game


Fowl Breeders Assistance Revolving Fund shall be transferred for any


purpose to any other state agency or any account of the Department


or be used for the purpose of contracting with any other state


agency or reimbursing any other state agency for any expense.


C. The Commercial Game Fowl Breeders Assistance Revolving Fund


shall be utilized for defraying veterinary costs for game fowls in


the event of a removal of game fowls from a commercial game fowl


breeder or facility. The fund may, in the discretion of the State


Board of Agriculture, also be used to defray costs associated with


care of game fowls including, but not limited to, feed and shelter.


SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1692.9, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 1139 Page 15


Section 1692.9. Nothing in this act Section 1692.1 et seq. of


this title shall prohibit any of the following:


A. 1. Hunting birds or fowl in accordance with Oklahoma


regulation or statute, including but not limited to the sport of


hunting game with trained raptors.;


B. 2. Agricultural production of fowl for human consumption; or


3. Commercial breeding of game fowl pursuant to this act.


SECTION 13. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1139 MR 1/19/2025 5:46:03 AM





























Req. No. 1139 Page 16